Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.073

Aggregate limit on loans and investments—Single borrower or business.

Unless part of an initial or amended business plan approved by the director, or as may otherwise be provided by rule adopted pursuant to RCW 31.24.120(3), the aggregate limit of qualified loans, qualified investment, and partial funding of qualified participation loans by a business development company to a single borrower or business, in relation to a business development project, shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits of the business development company.

[ 2006 c 87 s 9.]